Tennessee, session 114, HB1981.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 1, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
Lake County is designated as the Eagle Capital of Tennessee.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1981
010997
- 1 -